District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0832.
BE IT ENACTED by the Council of the District of Columbia, that this act may be cited as the
“Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Payment Modernization Act of 2026.”
Sec. 2. Section 16 of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective
March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.13), is amended as follows:
Section 16 of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective March 26,
1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.13), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b-2) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase "payments." and adding the
phrase "payments, and by transfers made through a third-party digital payment platform."
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows
“(2) Each Commission expending funds by EFT, ACH payments, or a third-party
digital payment platform shall do so pursuant to a procedure determined by the OANC that limits
monthly EFT, ACH payments, or a third-party digital payment platform expenditures relative to
the Commission's quarterly allotment.”

(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase "EFT or ACH payments" and
adding the phrase "EFT or ACH payments, or transaction identifiers assigned by a third-party
digital payment platform”
(b) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2A)(A) is amended by striking the phrase "debit card or ACH" and
adding the phrase "debit card, ACH, or a third-party digital payment platform".
(c) A new subsection (t-1) is added to read as follows:
"(t-1)(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "third-party digital payment
platform" means a payment service, accessible by website or mobile application, that:
(A) Allows electronic transfers of Commission funds from a depository
account or debit card to a vendor, grant recipient, or Commissioner;
(B) Provides the Commission with itemized transaction records that
include, at a minimum, the date, amount, payee, and an associated transaction identifier for each
transfer; and
(C) Allows the Commission to associate each transfer with a description
or memo field stating the purpose of the expenditure.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-191; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as

provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.